Hawaii statutes.
§461-12 Adequate equipment. A pharmacy
that compounds drugs shall be equipped with adequate pharmaceutical equipment
to ensure the proper compounding of prescriptions. The board shall by rules
prescribe the minimum of professional and technical equipment and reference
materials that a pharmacy shall at all times possess. [L 1949, c 175, pt of §1;
RL 1955, §71-12; HRS §461-12; am L 1986, c 143, §12; am L 1998, c 70, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next